District of Columbia statutes.
21-550

Surety.

The court in its discretion may require a petitioner under this subchapter to file an undertaking with surety to be approved by the court in such amount as the court deems proper, conditioned to save harmless the respondent by reason of costs incurred, including attorney’s fees, if any, and damages suffered by the respondent, as a result of any action under this subchapter.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 757, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 21-550.
1973 Ed., § 21-550.

Prior Codifications